Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 7 Hazardous Substances
8-7-907. Payments for corrective action.

No payment for corrective action shall be paid from the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund until the owner or operator has expended seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) on corrective action for the occurrence, except in cases in which the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality is using emergency authority under § 8-7-905(e). It is the intent of the General Assembly that this initial level of expenditure be considered the equivalent of an insurance policy deductible.

Owners or operators of underground storage tanks must demonstrate financial responsibility for the seven-thousand-five-hundred-dollar deductible for corrective actions.

Payment for corrective action shall not exceed one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) per occurrence.

All payments for corrective action expenses of the owner or operator shall be made only following proof that:

At the time of discovery of the release the owner or operator had paid all fees required under state law or rules applicable to petroleum storage tanks.

If the petroleum storage tank is an aboveground storage tank, the owner or operator may be eligible for reimbursement if the aboveground storage tank is registered under § 8-7-813 and all fees required under state law or rule have been paid;

The corrective action expenses submitted for reimbursement consist of items and amounts that are in accord and compliant with Division of Environmental Quality rules; and

The owner or operator cooperated fully with the division in corrective action to address the release.

Payment for corrective action may be denied if the storage tank owner or operator fails to report a release as required by rule promulgated by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, and the failure to report the release causes a delay in the corrective action that contributes to an adverse impact to the environment.

The commission may provide through rule for interim payments for corrective action.

Interim payments shall be subject to these limitations:

Proof of compliance with the requirements of subdivisions (c)(1)-(3) of this section must be provided;

Specific assurances must be provided that an approved corrective action plan, division directive, or order is being implemented and followed to date; and

Interim payments shall consist of payment of an amount not to exceed ninety percent (90%) of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000).

The remaining ten percent (10%) shall be released only upon final payment for corrective action concerning the occurrence.

In the event moneys are expended from the fund for corrective action and the owner or operator was not at the time of the occurrence eligible to receive reimbursement for corrective action, as defined by this subchapter and rules promulgated under this subchapter, the division may recover from the owner or operator the amount of moneys expended from the fund for corrective action by filing an action in the appropriate circuit court or by using the administrative procedures set forth in § 8-7-804.

The division also has a right of subrogation:

To any insurance policies in existence at the time of the occurrence to the extent of any rights the owner or operator of a site may have had under that policy; and

Against any third party who caused or contributed to the occurrence.

The right of subrogation shall apply to sites where corrective action is taken by:

Owners or operators; or

The division.

As used in this subsection, “third party” does not include a former owner or operator of the site where corrective action is taken.

Unknown petroleum storage tanks that have satisfied the requirements of subdivisions (c)(1)-(3) of this section shall be eligible for reimbursement for corrective action as provided by this section if:

The unknown petroleum storage tank is discovered while removing, upgrading, or replacing a petroleum storage tank meeting the requirements of subsection (c) of this section or while performing petroleum investigation or corrective action activities required by federal or state laws and the petroleum storage tank meeting the requirements of subsection (c) of this section is located on the same property or facility; or

The unknown petroleum storage tank is located on a right-of-way purchased by a city, county, or state governmental agency or entity and is discovered during construction in such a right-of-way.

Eligibility for reimbursement of unknown petroleum storage tanks will be conditioned on the payment of three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375) to the division.

If the owner or operator is found to have been in noncompliance with any state laws and rules and federal laws and regulations relating to storage tanks at the time of the occurrence, the division may assess a penalty in accordance with its applicable policies and procedures.

An owner or operator determined to be eligible for payment for corrective action for a release from a qualified storage tank or the division may transfer the eligibility to a subsequent owner or operator of the qualified storage tank if the division determines that the subsequent owner or operator has the financial and legal capacity to complete the corrective action and the subsequent owner or operator agrees in writing to assume responsibility for corrective action.

A transfer under subdivision (i)(1) of this section shall not affect the potential liability of the owner or operator for undertaking any required corrective action.

The removal of the storage tank after initiation of corrective action shall not bar the transfer of eligibility as provided in subdivision (i)(1) of this section.

A lender or secured creditor that holds ownership in a storage tank primarily to protect a security interest on the storage tank or the facility on which it is located, or both, is eligible for payment for corrective action if the lender or secured creditor assumes responsibility for completing the corrective action of a release from a qualified storage tank.

If an owner or operator is performing corrective action to the division's satisfaction, a lender or secured creditor is not eligible to assume responsibility for corrective action or to receive payment for corrective action.

Subdivisions (j)(1) and (2) of this section do not affect the liability of the owner or operator for undertaking any required corrective action.

The commission shall provide through rule a procedure under which an owner or operator or a consultant can be eligible for payment for the purchase of equipment needed for undertaking corrective action.

The procedure adopted under subdivision (k)(1) of this section shall include without limitation:

Depreciation schedules;

Reasonable rent as appropriate;

Evaluation of residual value of equipment; and

Providing for reversion of equipment to the division if the responsibility for the maintenance or payment for the equipment is not met.

The eligibility for payment of a consultant applies only to this subsection.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 173, § 7; 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 65, §§ 8, 9; 1993, No. 951, § 6; 1997, No. 642, § 1; 1997, No. 1027, § 1; 1999, No. 599, § 1; 2001, No. 1471, §§ 4, 5; 2003, No. 1114, § 3; 2005, No. 670, § 2; 2005, No. 1678, § 1; 2009, No. 282, §§ 4, 5; 2011, No. 809, § 1; 2013, No. 406, § 2; 2015, No. 699, §
1; 2017, No. 257, § 1;
2017, No. 584, § 2; 2019, No. 315, §§ 670-674; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2812-2820.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted (c)(4), which read: “The owner or operator submits a storage tank self-inspection audit as required in § 8-7-815”;
deleted (d)(2), which read: “Submits an inaccurate storage tank self-inspection audit that results in a delay in the corrective action of a release, and the delay contributes to an adverse impact to the environment” and redesignated the remaining subdivision accordingly; substituted “(c)(1)-(3)” for “(c)(1)-(4)” in (e)(2)(A) and (g)(1); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment added (i), (j), and (k).

The 2013 amendment substituted “this subsection” for “subdivision (k)(1) of this section” in (k)(3).

The 2015 amendment inserted “or the department” in (i)(1).

The 2017 amendment by No. 257 inserted “qualified” following “operator of the” in (i)(1).

The 2017 amendment by No. 584 redesignated former (c)(1) as (c)(1)(A), and added (c)(1)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c)(1)(A), (c)(2), and (f)(1); substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (c)(1)(B) and (d); deleted “and regulation” following “rule” in (e)(1) and (k)(1); and inserted “laws and rules” in (h).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1) and (c)(2); and
substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-7-908. Third-party claims.

No payment to any owner or operator against whom a third-party claim is brought for compensatory damages shall be paid from the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund until the owner or operator has expended seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) on third-party claims for the occurrence, except in cases in which:

The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality is using his or her emergency authority under § 8-7-905(e); or

The owner or operator has been discharged under the United States Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C. § 101 et seq., or is determined by a court to be insolvent.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that this initial level of expenditure be considered the equivalent of an insurance policy deductible.

Owners and operators of underground storage tanks must demonstrate financial responsibility for the seven-thousand-five-hundred-dollar deductible for third-party liability costs.

Payment for third-party claims shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) per occurrence.

All payments for third-party claims shall be made only following proof that:

At the time of the occurrence, the owner or operator was in substantial compliance with the financial responsibility requirements;

At the time of discovery of the release, the owner or operator had paid all fees required under state law or regulations applicable to petroleum storage tanks; and

A valid final court order or valid final order of the Arkansas State Claims Commission establishing a judgment against the owner or operator for compensatory damages caused by an accidental release from a qualified storage tank has been entered.

Any owner or operator against whom a third-party claim is filed in court or in the Arkansas State Claims Commission shall give written notice of the claim to the Division of Environmental Quality no later than twenty (20) days after service of summons or receipt of notification of the claim from the Arkansas State Claims Commission.

As a condition of eligibility, an owner or operator shall cooperate with and assist the division and, if applicable, the Attorney General's office in connection with the third-party claim.

At a minimum, the cooperation shall include active participation by the owner or operator throughout the litigation and providing assistance as required by the division or the Attorney General's office during resolution of a third-party claim.

In determining compliance with subdivisions (d)(1)(B) and (C) of this section, the director shall consider the owner's or operator's financial condition.

Upon receipt of the notice, the division shall immediately notify the Attorney General, who shall have the right to intervene in any such lawsuit or proceeding in order to protect the interests of the state in the fund.

Payment of third-party claims from the fund may be denied for any owner or operator who fails to give the division notice as required in this subsection.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may provide through rules for payments for third-party claims under settlement agreements between the parties without entry of a final court order or Arkansas State Claims Commission order.

Settlement payments for third-party claims shall be subject to these limitations:

Proof of compliance with the requirement of subdivisions (c)(1) and (2) of this section must be provided;

Specific assurances, such as dismissal with prejudice of the cause of action, that payment shall release the owner or operator from all future liability to the third-party claimant for this occurrence must be provided; and

The director must determine that litigation would result in costs to the fund which would exceed the settlement amount and, therefore, it would be in the best interests of the fund to pay the settlement amount.

In the event moneys are expended from the fund for third-party claims and the owner or operator was not at the time of the occurrence in substantial compliance, as defined by this subchapter and rules promulgated under this subchapter, the division may recover from the owner or operator the amount of moneys expended from the fund for the third-party claim by filing an action in the appropriate circuit court or by using the administrative procedures set forth in § 8-7-804.

The division also has a right of subrogation:

To any insurance policies in existence at the time of the occurrence to the extent of any rights the owner or operator of a site may have had under that insurance policy; and

Against any third party who caused or contributed to the occurrence.

The right of subrogation shall apply to sites where corrective action is taken by:

Owners or operators; or

The division.

As used in this subsection, “third party” does not include a former owner or operator of the site where corrective action is taken.

Unknown petroleum storage tanks that have satisfied the requirements of subdivision (c)(3) of this section shall be eligible for reimbursement for third-party claims as provided by this section if:

The unknown petroleum storage tank is discovered while removing, upgrading, or replacing a petroleum storage tank meeting the requirements of subsection (c) of this section or while performing petroleum investigation or corrective action activities required by federal or state laws and the petroleum storage tank meeting the requirements of subsection (c) of this section is located on the same property or facility; or

The unknown petroleum storage tank is located on a right-of-way purchased by a city, county, or state governmental agency or entity and is discovered during construction in the right-of-way.

Eligibility for reimbursement of unknown petroleum storage tanks will be conditioned on the payment of three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375) to the division.

An owner or operator determined to be eligible for payment for third-party claims for a release may transfer the eligibility to an owner or operator that acquires the storage tank if the division determines that the subsequent owner or operator has the financial and legal capacity and has assumed in writing the responsibility for third-party liability.

A transfer under subdivision (h)(1) of this section does not affect the potential liability of the owner or operator for payment of compensatory damages to a third party.

The removal of the storage tank after initiation of corrective action shall not bar the transfer of eligibility as provided in subdivision (h)(1) of this section.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 173, § 8; 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 65, §§ 10-13; 1993, No. 951, § 7; 1997, No. 641, § 5; 1997, No. 642, § 2; 1997, No. 1027, § 2; 1999, No. 599, § 2; 2003, No. 1114, §§ 4-6; 2005, No. 1678, § 2; 2011, No. 809, § 2; 2013, No. 406, § 3; 2019, No. 315, §§ 675, 676; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2821-2825.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (h).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (h)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “or regulations” following “rules” in (e)(1); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (f)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1)(A) and (d)(1)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-7-909. Confidential treatment of information.

Any records, reports, or information obtained by the Division of Environmental Quality, the Department of Energy and Environment, or the division's or department’s employees in the administration of this subchapter, except release data, shall be kept confidential upon a showing satisfactory to the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality that the records, reports, or information would constitute a trade secret under § 4-75-601 et seq.

As necessary to carry out the provisions of this subchapter, information afforded confidential treatment may be transmitted under a continuing claim of confidentiality to other officers or employees of the state or of the United States if the owner or operator of the facility to which the information pertains is informed of the transmittal and if the information has been acquired by the division under the provisions of this subchapter.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit the division's authority to release confidential information during emergency situations.

Any violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 951, § 8; 2019, No. 693, § 24; 2019, No. 910, § 2826.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 substituted “is a Class A” for “shall be unlawful and shall constitute a” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (a), substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” twice and inserted “the Department of Energy and Environment” and “division’s or”; substituted “division” for “department” in (b); and substituted “division’s” for “department’s” in (c).

Cross References.

Misdemeanors, § 5-1-107.

Subchapter 10
— Public Employees' Chemical Right to Know Act

Effective Dates.

Identical Acts 1991, Nos. 556 and 1172, §
20: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to provide the public employees of the state with critical information about hazardous chemicals to which they may be exposed. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect on July 1, 1991.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-7-1001. Title.

The provisions of this subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Public Employees' Chemical Right to Know Act”.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 556, § 1; 1991, No. 1172, § 1.

8-7-1002. Legislative findings and purpose.

The General Assembly finds that the proliferation and variety of hazardous chemicals present in government employment may affect the health, safety, and welfare of public employees of the State of Arkansas.

The General Assembly also finds that most private employers, in compliance with United States Occupational Safety and Health Administration regulations, provide their employees with training, information, and other protections concerning chemical hazards, but that public employees of the State of Arkansas and its political subdivisions are not subject to United States Occupational Safety and Health Administration regulations and do not receive the benefits of these protections.

It is the purpose of this subchapter to provide public employees access to training and information concerning hazardous chemicals to enable them to minimize their exposure to such hazardous chemicals and protect their health, safety, and welfare.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 556, § 2; 1991, No. 1172, § 2.

8-7-1003. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Chemical manufacturer” means an employer with a workplace where chemicals are produced for use or distribution;

[Repealed.]

“Distributor” means a business, other than a chemical manufacturer or importer, which supplies hazardous chemicals to other distributors or to employers;

“Exposure” or “exposed” means that an employee is subjected to a hazardous chemical in the course of employment through any route of entry (inhalation, ingestion, skin contact, or absorption, etc.), and includes potential, e.g., accidental or possible, exposure;

“Hazard Communication Standard” means the Hazard Communication Standard adopted by the United States Occupational Safety and Health Administration and codified in the Code of Federal Regulations at 29 C.F.R. § 1910.1200, as of July 1, 1991;

“Hazardous chemical” means any element, chemical compound, or mixture of elements or compounds which is a physical hazard or a health hazard as defined by the Hazard Communication Standard;

“Label” or “labeling” means any written, printed, or graphic material displayed on or affixed to containers of hazardous chemicals;

“Material safety data sheet” means written or printed material concerning a hazardous chemical which is prepared in accordance with the Hazard Communication Standard;

“Public employee” means any employee of a public employer who may be exposed to hazardous chemicals in the workplace under normal operating conditions or foreseeable emergencies.

Office workers and nonresident management are not generally included unless their job performance routinely involves potential exposure to hazardous chemicals;

“Public employer” means the State of Arkansas and each political subdivision thereof, as defined in § 21-5-603(b);

“Trade secret” is defined in accordance with § 4-75-601(4);

“Work area” means a room or defined space in a workplace where hazardous chemicals are produced or used and where public employees are present;

“Workplace” means an establishment, job site, or project at one (1) geographical location containing one (1) or more work areas under a public employer's control or direction; and

“Workplace chemical list” means a list of hazardous chemicals in a workplace developed pursuant to § 8-7-1007.

All other definitions of the Hazard Communication Standard as they exist on the date of enactment of this subchapter are hereby adopted and incorporated by reference.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 556, § 3; 1991, No. 1172, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 5267.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the phrase “date of enactment of this subchapter”, Acts 1991, No. 556 was approved and signed by the Governor on March 14, 1991, and became effective July 1, 1991. Acts 1991, No. 1172 was approved and signed by the Governor on April 10, 1991, and became effective on July 15, 1991.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed (a)(2).

8-7-1004. Duties of public employers.

Each public employer shall do the following:

Post adequate notice, as provided by the Director of the Division of Labor, at locations where notices are normally posted, informing public employees about their rights under this subchapter;

Ensure proper hazardous chemical labeling in accordance with § 8-7-1005;

Maintain and make available material safety data sheets in accordance with § 8-7-1006;

Compile and maintain a workplace chemical list in accordance with § 8-7-1007;

Provide public employee information and training in accordance with § 8-7-1008; and

Handle trade secrets in accordance with § 8-7-1012.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 556, § 4; 1991, No. 1172, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 5268.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (1).

8-7-1005. Labeling — Definition.

Existing labels on containers of hazardous chemicals shall not be removed or defaced.

If a public employer transfers a hazardous chemical from the original container to another container, the public employer shall reproduce or otherwise place on the container to which the hazardous chemical was transferred the identity of the hazardous chemical and appropriate hazard warnings.

However, if such hazardous chemical is regulated under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. § 136 et seq., or the Arkansas Pesticide Control Act, § 2-16-401 et seq., then such public employer shall reproduce on the container to which such hazardous chemical was transferred the chemical name or common name on the original container.

A public employer is not required to label portable containers into which hazardous chemicals are transferred from labeled containers and which are intended only for the immediate use of the public employee who performs the transfer. Public employees shall not be required to work with a hazardous chemical from an unlabeled container except for a portable container intended for immediate use by the public employee who placed the hazardous chemical into the portable container. As used in this subsection, “unlabeled container” means a container which is not labeled in accordance with this section or the Hazard Communication Standard.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 556, § 5; 1991, No. 1172, § 5.

8-7-1006. Material safety data sheets.

Chemical manufacturers and distributors shall provide public employers which purchase a hazardous chemical from them with an appropriate material safety data sheet prior to or with their initial shipment of the hazardous chemical and with the first shipment after the material safety data sheet for the hazardous chemical is updated.

Public employers shall maintain the most current material safety data sheet received from chemical manufacturers or distributors for each hazardous chemical in the workplace. If a material safety data sheet has not been provided by the chemical manufacturer or distributor at the time the hazardous chemicals are received at the workplace, the public employer shall request one in writing from the chemical manufacturer or distributor within five (5) business days.

Material safety data sheets shall be readily available upon request to public employees and their designated representatives.

If a material safety data sheet for a hazardous chemical is not readily available upon request, a public employee or his or her designated representative may submit a written request for the material safety data sheet to the public employer. The public employer, within three (3) business days, either shall furnish a copy of the requested material safety data sheet to the requester or, if the requested material safety data sheet is not in the public employer's possession, shall demonstrate to the requester that the public employer has made an effort to obtain the material safety data sheet from the distributor, chemical manufacturer, or other source.

If after two (2) weeks from receipt of the request the public employer has not furnished the requester with the requested material safety data sheet, the public employer shall not require the public employee to work with the hazardous chemical for which the material safety data sheet was requested until the material safety data sheet is furnished, unless:

The manufacturer of the substance for which the material safety data sheet was requested furnishes a written statement that the substance is not a hazardous chemical as defined in § 8-7-1003;

The public employer can demonstrate to the public employee that the material safety data sheet cannot be obtained through no fault of the public employer; or

The public employer can demonstrate to the public employee that the material safety data sheet will be furnished by a date specified by the public employer within one (1) additional week, provided that the public employee shall not be required to work with the hazardous chemical if the material safety data sheet is not furnished by the date specified.

If a public employee declines to work with a hazardous chemical as authorized by this subsection, he or she shall not be penalized. Reassignment of a public employee to other work at equal pay and benefits shall not be considered a penalty under this subsection.

A public employer, chemical manufacturer, or distributor shall provide a copy of a material safety data sheet to the Director of the Division of Labor upon request.

A public employer, chemical manufacturer, or distributor may meet the requirements of this section with respect to a hazardous chemical which is a mixture either by providing a material safety data sheet for each element or compound in the mixture which is a hazardous chemical or by providing a material safety data sheet for the mixture itself. If more than one (1) mixture has the same element or compound, only one (1) material safety data sheet for that element or compound is necessary.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 556, § 6; 1991, No. 1172, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 5269.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (e).

8-7-1007. Workplace chemical lists.

Each public employer shall compile and maintain a workplace chemical list which shall contain the following information for each hazardous chemical normally used, generated, or stored in the workplace in an amount equal to or greater than fifty-five gallons (55 gals.) or five hundred pounds (500 lbs.):

The chemical name or common name used on the material safety data sheet or the container label;

The Chemical Abstracts Service number for such hazardous chemical if such Chemical Abstracts Service number is included on the material safety data sheet; and

The work area or workplace in which the hazardous chemical is normally used, generated, or stored.

Each public employer shall update the workplace chemical list with the Director of the Division of Labor as necessary, but in any case by July 1 of each year.

A public employer may meet the requirements of this section with respect to a hazardous chemical which is a mixture either by identifying on the workplace chemical list each element or compound in the mixture which is a hazardous chemical or by identifying on the workplace chemical list the mixture itself. If more than one (1) mixture has the same element or compound, only one (1) listing of the element or compound is necessary.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 556, § 7; 1991, No. 1172, § 7; 2019, No. 693, § 25; 2019, No. 910, § 5270.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5270, amended subsection (b) of this section to insert “or the Division of Labor” following “Labor” in the phrase “shall file the workplace chemical list with the Director of the Department of Labor no later than ninety (90) days after July 1, 1991”. However, Acts 2019, No 693, § 25, specifically repealed this phrase.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 693, in (b), deleted “shall file the workplace chemical list with the Director of the Department of Labor no later than ninety (90) days after July 1, 1991, and” following “Each public employer”, inserted “with the Director of the Division of Labor”, and substituted “each year” for “each subsequent year”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 inserted “or the Division of Labor” following “Department of Labor” in (b).

8-7-1008. Employee information and training.

Each public employer shall provide an information and training program for its public employees as defined in § 8-7-1003. Additional instruction shall be provided whenever a new hazard is introduced into their work area or whenever new and significant information is received by the public employer concerning the hazards of a chemical. New or newly assigned public employees shall be provided training before working in a work area containing hazardous chemicals.

The information and training program provided pursuant to this section shall be developed in accordance with rules to be promulgated by the Director of the Department of Labor or the Division of Labor pursuant to § 8-7-1011.

The rules shall include, at a minimum, requirements concerning:

Information on interpreting labels and material safety data sheets and the relationship between these two (2) methods of hazard communication;

The location and availability of the workplace chemical list and material safety data sheets;

Any operations in a public employee's work area where hazardous chemicals are present;

The physical and health hazards of the hazardous chemicals in the work area;

Methods and observations that may be used to detect the presence or release of a hazardous chemical in the work area, such as monitoring conducted by the public employer, continuous monitoring devices, visual appearance or odor of hazardous chemicals when being released, etc.;

The measures public employees can take to protect themselves from these hazards, including specific procedures the public employer has implemented to protect public employees from exposure to hazardous chemicals, such as appropriate work practices, emergency procedures, and personal protective equipment to be used;

Frequency of training;

General safety instructions on the handling, cleanup, and disposal of hazardous chemicals; and

Public employees’ rights under this subchapter.

Training programs addressing each of the requirements of subsection (b) of this section and conducted in full compliance with Title III of the Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. § 11001 et seq., shall be deemed to meet the requirements of this section.

Public employers shall keep a record of the dates of training sessions given to their public employees.

The information and training program required under this section may be conducted with the assistance of the director pursuant to § 8-7-1009.

The director shall have authority to promulgate rules in accordance with § 8-7-1011:

To exempt public employers from providing the information and training otherwise required by this section to public employees with special skills and knowledge concerning hazardous chemicals, if such special skills and knowledge would make the information and training unnecessary; and

To require public employers to provide refresher training for public employees in workplaces or in circumstances in which the director reasonably determines such refresher training to be necessary and appropriate.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 556, § 8; 1991, No. 1172, § 8; 2019, No. 315, §§ 677, 678; 2019, No. 693, §§ 26, 27; 2019, No. 910, § 5271.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(1) and the introductory language of (b)(2); deleted “within six (6) months after July 1, 1991” at the end of (b)(1); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the introductory language of (f).

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 deleted “within six (6) months after July 1, 1991” from the end of (b)(1); and rewrote (e) to delete obsolete language.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 inserted “or the Division of Labor” in (b)(1).

8-7-1009. Outreach activities of the director.

The Director of the Division of Labor shall develop and give each public employer a suitable form of notice providing public employees with information regarding their rights under this subchapter.

The director shall develop and maintain a general information and training assistance program to aid public employers. The general information and training assistance program shall be made available to all public employers. As part of the general information and training assistance program, the director may develop and distribute a supply of informational leaflets on public employers' duties, public employees' rights, and the effects of hazardous chemicals.

The director may contract with state universities or other public or private organizations to develop and implement the outreach program.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 556, § 9; 1991, No. 1172, § 9; 2019, No. 693, § 28; 2019, No. 910, § 5272.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 693, in (b), substituted “The general information and training assistance program” for “Such information and assistance” in the second sentence, substituted “general information and training assistance program” for “program” in the third sentence, and deleted the former last sentence.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (a).

8-7-1010. Rights of public employees.

Public employees who may be exposed to hazardous chemicals shall be informed of such exposure and shall have access to the workplace chemical list, material safety data sheets for the hazardous chemicals on the workplace chemical list, and information and training as provided in this subchapter.

No public employer shall discharge or cause to be discharged or otherwise discipline or discriminate against a public employee because the public employee has requested information, filed a complaint, assisted an inspector of the Director of the Division of Labor, or instituted or caused to be instituted any complaint or proceeding under or related to this subchapter or has testified or is about to testify in any such proceeding or has exercised any rights afforded by this subchapter on behalf of the public employee or other public employees, nor shall any pay, position, seniority, or other benefits to which the public employee may be entitled be lost because the public employee exercised rights afforded by this subchapter.

Any waiver of the benefits or requirements of this subchapter shall be against public policy and shall be null and void. Any public employer's request or requirement that a person waive any rights under this subchapter as a condition of or in connection with employment shall constitute a violation.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 556, § 10; 1991, No. 1172, § 10; 2019, No. 910, § 5273.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (b).

8-7-1011. Rulemaking.

The Director of the Division of Labor may promulgate rules in accordance with the provisions of §§ 11-2-110, 11-2-112, and 11-2-113 to implement the provisions of this subchapter. This authority shall include, but not be limited to, the authority to implement changes corresponding to future amendments to the Hazard Communication Standard to maintain consistency between this subchapter and the Hazard Communication Standard.

The director shall promulgate rules requiring public employers to carry out information and training programs for their public employees and specifying the minimum content of education and training programs as provided in § 8-7-1008.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 556, § 11; 1991, No. 1172, § 11; 2019, No. 315, § 679; 2019, No. 693, § 29; 2019, No. 910, § 5274.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the first sentence of (a); substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b); and made a stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 deleted “within six (6) months after July 1, 1991” preceding “requiring public employers” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (a).